Hawaii statutes.
§605-2 Attorneys; license required.
Except as provided by the rules of court, no person shall be allowed to
practice in any court of the State unless that person has been duly licensed so
to do by the supreme court; provided that nothing in this chapter shall prevent
any person, plaintiff, defendant, or accused, from appearing in person before
any court, and there prosecuting or defending that person's, plaintiff's,
defendant's, or accused's own cause, without the aid of legal counsel; provided
further that in the district courts sections 605-13 and 633-28 shall apply. [CC
1859, §1068; RL 1925, §2305; RL 1935, §3604; RL 1945, §9702; RL 1955, §217-2;
HRS §605-2; am L 1972, c 184, §1(b); am L 1989, c 140, §4; gen ch 1992]

Rules of Court

See RSC rule 1.

Registration of attorneys and self-represented parties as
judiciary electronic filing system users, see HEFSR rule 4; HRPP rule 4.

Law Journals and Reviews

Ke Kanawai Mamalahoe: Equality in Our Splintered
Profession. 33 UH L. Rev. 249 (2010).

Case Notes

Failure to assign counsel before it appears defendant is
indigent, not error. 15 H. 139, 143 (1903).

Right of self representation discussed. 53 H. 23, 487 P.2d
286 (1971).

Statutory liquidator of dissolved corporation under §416-124
does not have right to appear pro se, but where there are no funds to hire
attorney, liquidator may perform legal services. 53 H. 23, 487 P.2d 286 (1971).

Court's order enjoining one's unauthorized practice of law
applies to practice in federal court in absence of regulations by the federal
court. 55 H. 458, 522 P.2d 460 (1974).

Generally a corporation cannot represent itself in
litigation, but can do so only by an attorney. 60 H. 372, 590 P.2d 570 (1979).

Cited: 5 H. 279, 282 (1885).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next